Alabama, session 2026rs, SB226.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 2

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
SB226 Enrolled
57 Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
58 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
59 $1,268,538 from the Personnel Fund to the State Personnel
60 Department for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
61 Section 2. In addition to all other appropriations
62 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
63 $34,000,000, estimated, in federal funds from the American
64 Rescue Plan Act - State Small Business Credit Initiative Fund
65 to the Department of Finance for the fiscal year ending
66 September 30, 2026. These funds may be delegated through
67 memoranda of agreement to the Alabama Innovation Corporation
68 or other entity so designated by the Department of Finance.
69 Section 3. In addition to all other appropriations
70 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
71 $588,612 from the Federal Stimulus Fund to Alabama Medicaid
72 Agency for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
73 Section 4. In addition to all other appropriations
74 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
75 $16,000,000 from the Alabama Energy Infrastructure Fund to the
76 State Industrial Development Authority for the fiscal year
77 ending September 30, 2026.
78 Section 5. In addition to all other appropriations
79 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
80 $50,000,000 from the Strategic Energy Infrastructure
81 Development Fund to the State Industrial Development Authority
82 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
83 Section 6. In addition to all other appropriations
84 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
Page 3

heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
SB226 Enrolled
85 $3,600,000 from the Administrative Office of Courts Federal
86 and Local Funds Fund to the Unified Judicial System for the
87 fiscal year ending September 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law
88 to the contrary, the funds appropriated under this section may
89 be spent on salaries and personnel costs and for other general
90 operations of the Unified Judicial System.
91 Section 7. In addition to all other appropriations
92 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
93 $2,300,000 from the Court Automation Fund to the Unified
94 Judicial System for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
95 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the funds
96 appropriated under this section may be spent on salaries and
97 personnel costs and for other general operations of the
98 Unified Judicial System.
99 Section 8. In addition to all other appropriations
100 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
101 $1,000,000 from the Advanced Technology and Data Exchange Fund
102 to the Unified Judicial System for the fiscal year ending
103 September 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
104 the funds appropriated under this section may be spent on
105 salaries and personnel costs and for other general operations
106 of the Unified Judicial System.
107 Section 9. In addition to all other appropriations
108 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
109 $4,100,000 from the State Judicial Administration Fund to the
110 Unified Judicial System for the fiscal year ending September
111 30, 2026. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the funds
112 appropriated under this section may be spent on salaries and
Page 4

appropriated under this section may be spent on salaries and
SB226 Enrolled
113 personnel costs and for other general operations of the
114 Unified Judicial System.
115 Section 10. In addition to all other appropriations
116 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
117 $32,000 from the Genetic Counseling Fund to the Alabama Board
118 of Genetic Counseling for the fiscal year ending September 30,
119 2026.
120 Section 11. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
121 2026, $2,000,000 shall be transferred from the Bureau of
122 Tourism and Travel Fund to the Alabama Site Development Fund.
123 Section 12. In addition to all other appropriations
124 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
125 $2,000,000 from the Alabama Site Development Fund to the State
126 Industrial Development Authority for the Site Evaluation
127 Economic Development Strategy pursuant to Article 2D, Chapter
128 10 of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975, for fiscal year ending
129 September 30, 2026.
130 Section 13. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
131 2026, up to $22,137,949 shall be transferred from the
132 Refundable Tax Credit Fund to the Legislative Council Fund.
133 Section 14. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
134 2026, $13,000,000 shall be transferred from the Real Property
135 Management Fund to the Legislative Council Fund.
136 Section 15. In addition to all other appropriations
137 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated up
138 to $35,137,949 from the Legislative Council Fund to the
139 Legislative Council for construction and related expenses for
140 the new State House for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
Page 5

the new State House for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
SB226 Enrolled
141 Section 16. In addition to all other appropriations
142 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
143 $1,000,000 from the Vaping and Licensing Enforcement Fund to
144 the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for fiscal year
145 ending September 30, 2026.
146 Section 17. In addition to all other appropriations
147 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated up
148 to $1,000,000 from the Consumable Hemp Product Compliance Fund
149 to the Alabama Alcoholic Beverage Control Board for fiscal
150 year ending September 30, 2026.
151 Section 18. In addition to all other appropriations
152 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
153 $50,000 from the Geological Survey Library Revolving Fund to
154 Geological Survey for fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
155 Section 19. In addition to all other appropriations
156 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
157 $750,000 from the Youth Services Reimbursement Fund for
158 Diversion Programs to the Department of Youth Services for
159 fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
160 Section 20. In addition to all other appropriations
161 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
162 $387,500,000 from the Public Road and Bridge Fund to the
163 Alabama Department of Transportation for fiscal year ending
164 September 30, 2026.
165 Section 21. In addition to all other appropriations
166 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
167 $200,000,000 from the Rebuild Alabama Fund to the Alabama
168 Department of Transportation for fiscal year ending September
Page 6

Department of Transportation for fiscal year ending September
SB226 Enrolled
169 30, 2026.
170 Section 22. In addition to all other appropriations
171 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
172 $30,000,000 from the Broadband Accessibility Fund to the
173 Alabama Department of Economic and Community Affairs for
174 fiscal year ending September 30, 2026.
175 Section 23. For the fiscal year ending September 30,
176 2026, $1,000,000 shall be transferred from the Bureau of
177 Tourism and Travel Fund to the Game and Fish Fund.
178 Section 24. In addition to all other appropriations
179 heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
180 $1,000,000 from the Game and Fish Fund to the Alabama
181 Department of Conservation and Natural Resources for the
182 Alabama State Wildlife Action Plan for fiscal year ending
183 September 30, 2026.
184 Section 25. Section 3C of Act 2025-251, the General
185 Appropriations Act for the fiscal year ending September 30,
186 2026, is hereby amended as follows:
187 "124. Transportation Department of...
188 There is hereby appropriated for payment of the
189 principal of and the interest on all bonds heretofore or
190 hereafter issued for public highways and bridge purposes, or
191 either, by the State of Alabama, Alabama Federal Aid Highway
192 Finance Authority, Alabama Highway Finance Corporation, or
193 Alabama Industrial Access Road and Bridge Corporation, or
194 Alabama Highway Authority, a total of $133,755,861
195 $193,564,457 or so much thereof as may be necessary for
196 payment of said principal and interest at their respective
Page 7

payment of said principal and interest at their respective
SB226 Enrolled
197 maturities, of the revenues pledged for such payment. There is
198 also hereby appropriated an amount not to exceed $25,000,000
199 as an annual contribution to the Alabama Transportation
200 Infrastructure Bank, if needed, for payment of debt service.
201 The Director of Transportation, with the consent of the
202 Governor and the Director of Finance, shall have the authority
203 to transfer any appropriation or any portion thereof between
204 and among subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) of this section
205 whenever such transfer shall be necessary to assure maximum
206 utilization of federal matching funds which shall become
207 available. In the event that there shall not be sufficient
208 funds available for payment of all appropriations hereinabove
209 made, the following provisions shall be applicable. In the
210 event of such insufficiency in respect of said revenues
211 accruing to the Department of Transportation: (1) the
212 appropriation made for Debt Service in subdivisions (a) and
213 (b) hereof shall be paid in full, and (2) the appropriations
214 from the revenues accruing to the Department of Transportation
215 that are herein made for the purposes referred to in
216 subdivisions (a), (b) and (c) except for Debt Service, hereof
217 shall be allocated among the purposes referred to in said
218 subdivisions in such order and with such priorities as the
219 Director of the Department of Transportation shall from time
220 to time direct. The funds appropriated in subdivisions (a) and
221 (c) hereof, for the matching federal funds, shall not revert
222 at the end of the fiscal year for which such appropriations
223 are made but shall remain available for the purposes for which
224 such appropriations were made. In addition to all
Page 8

such appropriations were made. In addition to all
SB226 Enrolled
225 appropriations hereinabove made, there is hereby appropriated
226 to the Department of Transportation all federal funds accruing
227 thereto to be expended only for the purpose for which such
228 funds are made available."
229 Section 26. Notwithstanding any other provisions of
230 this act or any other act, any amounts from appropriations for
231 the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, to the various
232 state agencies in this act which were unexpended and reverted
233 on September 30, 2026, are hereby reappropriated to the
234 respective offices for the fiscal year beginning October 1,
235 2026.
236 Section 27. This act shall become effective immediately
237 upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or its
238 otherwise becoming law.
Page 9

otherwise becoming law.
SB226 Enrolled
239
240
241
242
243
244
245 ________________________________________________
246 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
247
248
249
250 ________________________________________________
251 Speaker of the House of Representatives
252
253
254 SB226
255 Senate 11-Mar-26
256 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
257 the Senate, as amended.
258
259 Patrick Harris,
260 Secretary.
261
262
263
264
265 House of Representatives
266 Amended and passed: 01-Apr-26
267
268
269
270
271 Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26
272
273
274
275
276 By: Senator Albritton
Page 10